Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2301
Hearings; authorized; powers of director.

In addition to examinations expressly authorized under Chapter 44, the Director of Insurance may hold hearings to procure information helpful in the lawful administration of any of the provisions of such chapter. For the purpose of holding a hearing and the production of documents and attendance of witnesses, the director shall have the power to appoint one or more special employees as his assistant or assistants, and to employ such counsels and clerks as may be deemed necessary and give each such person such powers to assist the department as the director may consider proper.

Laws 1969, c. 357, § 1, p. 1254;

Laws 1971, LB 891, § 1.